Utah statutes.
32B-1-608.   Disciplinary proceeding for violation.

A person who violates this part is subject to a disciplinary proceeding under Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

